Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.030

Office of minority and women's business enterprises—Director—Powers and duties.

There is hereby created the office of minority and women's business enterprises. The governor shall appoint a director for the office, subject to confirmation by the senate. The director may employ a deputy director and a confidential secretary, both of which shall be exempt under chapter 41.06 RCW, and such staff as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The office shall consult with the minority and women's business enterprises advisory committee to:

(1) Develop, plan, and implement programs to provide an opportunity for participation by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses in public works and the process by which goods and services are procured by state agencies and educational institutions from the private sector;

(2) Develop a comprehensive plan insuring that qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses are provided an opportunity to participate in public contracts for public works and goods and services;

(3) Identify barriers to equal participation by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses in all state agency and educational institution contracts;

(4) Establish annual overall goals for participation by qualified minority and women-owned and controlled businesses for each state agency and educational institution to be administered on a contract-by-contract basis or on a class-of-contracts basis;

(5) Develop and maintain a central minority and women's business enterprise certification list for all state agencies and educational institutions. No business is entitled to certification under this chapter unless it meets the definition of small business concern as established by the office. All applications for certification under this chapter shall be sworn under oath;

(6) Develop, implement, and operate a system of monitoring compliance with this chapter;

(7) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, governing: (a) Establishment of agency goals; (b) development and maintenance of a central minority and women's business enterprise certification program and a public works small business certification program, including a definition of "small business concern" which shall be consistent with the small business requirements defined under section 3 of the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 632, and its implementing regulations as guidance; (c) procedures for monitoring and enforcing compliance with goals, regulations, contract provisions, and this chapter; (d) utilization of standard clauses by state agencies and educational institutions, as specified in RCW 39.19.050; and (e) determination of an agency's or educational institution's goal attainment consistent with the limitations of RCW 39.19.075;

(8) Submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature outlining the progress in implementing this chapter;

(9) Investigate complaints of violations of this chapter with the assistance of the involved agency or educational institution; and

(10) Cooperate and act jointly or by division of labor with the United States or other states, and with political subdivisions of the state of Washington and their respective minority, socially and economically disadvantaged and women business enterprise programs to carry out the purposes of this chapter. However, the power which may be exercised by the office under this subsection permits investigation and imposition of sanctions only if the investigation relates to a possible violation of chapter 39.19 RCW, and not to violation of local ordinances, rules, regulations, however denominated, adopted by political subdivisions of the state.

[ 2023 c 395 s 3; 1996 c 69 s 5; 1989 c 175 s 85; 1987 c 328 s 3; 1983 c 120 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Intent—1996 c 69: "It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the counting of the dollar value of an agency's or educational institution's expenditures to certified minority and women's business enterprises meaningfully reflects the actual financial participation of the certified businesses." [ 1996 c 69 s 3.]

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.